Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8301.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-17.1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Environmental
Management" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-17.1-47. Boat ramp maintenance.
(a) As used herein, the term “boat ramps and docks” refers to a sloping floor, walk, or
roadway into a body of water, for the purpose of launching, hauling or operation of boats into,
upon, or out of, the body of water. The term also includes docks, piers, and related in-water
structures.
(b) It is the responsibility of the state, through the department of environmental
management (the “department”), to maintain and repair state owned or operated boat ramps and
docks, thereby maintaining public boating access and infrastructure to facilitate that public access.
(c) There is hereby established a “public boat ramps and docks” restricted receipt account
to implement the provisions of this section. This account shall be funded from the receipt of fees
for the use of state owned or operated boat ramps and docks. The department shall establish by rule
and regulation adopted by the department what percentage of these fees collected shall be placed
in the restricted receipt account.
(d) The department shall also promulgate rules and regulations to delineate the division of
ownership, maintenance, and repair of boat ramps and docks between municipalities and the
department.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006063
========
LC006063 - Page 2 of 3